Tennessee, session 114, SB2278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-1-108(a), is amended by deleting
"quarterly" and substituting "monthly".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-1-108(b), is amended by deleting
"end of the quarter" and substituting "end of the month".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2278
012168
- 1 -